South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3766.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  SECTION 2 of Act 36 of 2019 is amended to read: SECTION 2.  The requirements of Section 57-5-880, as added by this act, expire on July 1, 20262031, unless otherwise extended by the General Assembly. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----